Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.160

Immunization program—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction with regard to public schools and the state board of education with regard to private schools, in consultation with the state board of health, shall each adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW that establish the procedural and substantive due process requirements governing the exclusion of children from schools pursuant to RCW 28A.210.120.

[ 2006 c 263 s 910; 1990 c 33 s 199; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.31.118.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: See notes following RCW 28A.210.060.